Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5495.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 48.23.260 and 1947 c 79 s .23.26 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The insurer may in any life insurance policy or annuity or pure endowment contract limit its liability to a determinable amount not less than the full reserve of the policy and of dividend additions thereto in event only of death occurring:(a) As a result of war, or any act of war, declared or undeclared, or of service in the military, naval or air forces or in civilian forces auxiliary thereto, or from any cause while a member of any such military, naval or air forces of any country at war, declared or undeclared.(b) As a result of suicide of the insured, whether sane or insane, within ((two years))one year from date of issue of the policy.(c) As a result of aviation under conditions specified in the policy.(2) An insurer may specify conditions pertaining to the items of subsection (1) of this section which in the commissioner's opinion are more favorable to the policyholder.Sec. 2. RCW 48.34.090 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 266 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:(1) All credit life insurance and credit accident and health insurance shall be evidenced by an individual policy, or in the case of group insurance by a certificate of insurance, which individual policy or group certificate of insurance shall be delivered to the debtor.(2) Each individual policy or group certificate of credit life insurance, and/or credit accident and health insurance shall, in addition to other requirements of law, set forth the name and home office address of the insurer, the name or names of the debtor or in the case of a certificate under a group policy, the identity by name or otherwise of the debtor, the premium or amount of payment, if any, by the debtor separately for credit life insurance and credit accident and health insurance, a description of the coverage including the amount and term thereof, and any exceptions, limitations and restrictions, and shall state that the benefits shall be paid to the creditor to reduce or extinguish the unpaid indebtedness and, wherever the amount of insurance exceeds the unpaid indebtedness, that any such excess shall be payable to a beneficiary, other than the creditor, named by the debtor or to the debtor's estate. With respect to any policy issued after ((September 8, 1975))January 1, 2026, credit life insurance shall not be subject to any exceptions or reductions other than for fraud, or for suicide occurring within ((two years))one year of the effective date of the insurance.(3) The individual policy or group certificate of insurance shall be delivered to the insured debtor at the time the indebtedness is incurred except as provided in subsections (4) and (5).(4) If such individual policy or group certificate of insurance is not delivered to the debtor at the time the indebtedness is incurred, a copy of the application for such policy or a notice of proposed insurance, signed by the debtor and setting forth the name and home office address of the insurer; the name or names of the debtor; the premium or amount of payment by the debtor, if any, separately for credit life insurance and credit accident and health insurance; the amount, term and a brief description of the coverage provided, shall be delivered to the debtor at the time such indebtedness is incurred. The copy of the application for, or notice of proposed insurance, shall also refer exclusively to insurance coverage, and shall be separate and apart from the loan, sale or other credit statement of account, instrument, or agreement, or the application for any such loan, sale or credit, unless the information required by this subsection is prominently set forth therein under a descriptive heading which shall be underlined and printed in capital letters. Upon acceptance of the insurance by the insurer and within thirty days of the date upon which the indebtedness is incurred, the insurer shall cause the individual policy or group certificate of insurance to be delivered to the debtor. The application or notice of proposed insurance shall state that upon acceptance by the insurer, the insurance shall become effective as provided in RCW 48.34.080.(5) If the named insurer does not accept the risk, then the debtor shall receive a policy or certificate of insurance setting forth the name and home office address of the substituted insurer and the amount of the premium to be charged, and if the amount of premium is less than that set forth in the notice of proposed insurance an appropriate refund shall be made.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. This act takes effect January 1, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. This act applies to life insurance policies issued or renewed on or after the effective date of this section.--- END ---